Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.230

Designation of official newspaper.

Each code city shall designate an official newspaper by resolution. The newspaper shall be of general circulation in the city and have the qualifications prescribed by chapter 65.16 RCW.

[ 1985 c 469 s 102.]